Illinois, session 104th, HB4256.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Daniel 5Capuano Memorial Act.  6    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 7Section 12-5.1b as follows: 8    (720 ILCS 5/12-5.1b new)9    Sec. 12-5.1b. First responder endangerment.10    (a) In this Section:11        "Commercial property" means developed real property 12    used exclusively for business purposes, including 13    non-residential spaces in mixed-use property, and does not 14    include residential or multi-family real property.15        "Dangerous condition" means a patently obvious 16    condition of a life-threatening nature that results from 17    structural or architectural work done without first 18    submitting for a permit, or from a building code violation 19    of which the person received actual notice from the code 20    compliance official and failed to take corrective action 21    within the time period specified by the code compliance 22    official. "Dangerous condition" does not include actions   HB4256- 2 -LRB104 16804 RLC 30213 b1    undertaken without a permit to address or remediate a 2    situation or condition that presents a clear and present 3    threat to safety or to the integrity of the building. 4    "Dangerous condition" does not include any failure by a 5    governmental entity to make capital improvements or fund 6    repairs that are not supported by an appropriation or 7    budget enacted or adopted specifically for the property.8        "First responder" means emergency medical services 9    personnel as defined in Section 3.5 of the Emergency 10    Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act, a law enforcement 11    officer, or firefighter.12        "Management or operational control" means the lawful 13    ownership of or direct contractual relationship with the 14    lawful owner for the person to manage the commercial 15    property. "Management or operational control" does not 16    include engineering, security, elevator operating, or dock 17    or janitorial services performed by any person who is 18    retained exclusively to provide the services and who does 19    not have overall management or operational control of the 20    building.21        "Person" means a natural person, and only includes an 22    individual who had personal or professional management or 23    operational control of commercial real estate and who 24    directly exercised final decision-making authority to 25    create and conceal the dangerous condition causing death 26    or serious bodily injury.  HB4256- 3 -LRB104 16804 RLC 30213 b1        "Serious bodily injury" means bodily injury that 2    results in a permanent disfigurement or permanent loss or 3    impairment of a bodily function, limb, or organ.4    (b) A person commits first responder endangerment when he 5or she:6        (1) knowingly creates a dangerous condition; and7        (2) intentionally conceals the dangerous condition in 8    a commercial property under his or her management or 9    operational control and the dangerous condition is the 10    primary cause of the death or serious bodily injury of a 11    first responder in the course of his or her official 12    duties.13    (c) Sentence. First responder endangerment is a Class 4 14felony.